Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 248.370 is amended to read:
248.370. (1) The electors of President and Vice President shall  convene at the State Capitol on
the [ Monday] first Tuesday  after  the second Wednesday in December following their election  at a
time to be established by the Secretary of State by rule .
(2) Not later than six days prior to the  convening of electors under subsection (1) of this
section, the Governor and the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of ascertainment
of appointment of electors as required by 3 U.S.C.  5. The certificate of ascertainment shall
contain a security feature or features for the purpose of verifying the authenticity of  the
certificate. The Secretary of State  shall determine by rule the form of the security feature
or features under this subsection.
(3) If there is any vacancy  in the office of an elector caused by death, refusal to act, neglect
to attend or otherwise, the electors present [ immediately] shall fill [ it] the vacancy  by plurality  of
voice votes  at the time and place of the convening of electors under subsection (1) of this
section. The Governor and the Secretary of State shall issue  an amended certificate of
ascertainment containing the name of any elector who fills  a vacancy under this
subsection.
(4) Prior to the voice vote to  fill a vacancy under subsection (3) of this section, a candi-
date for filling the vacancy shall sign the pledge required under ORS 248.355.
(5) When all  the electors have appeared [ or the ] and any vacancies have been filled, the electors
shall take and subscribe to  an oath of office administered by the Secretary of State. Fol-
lowing the taking of the oath of office under this subsection, the electors shall  perform  the
duties required of them by the Constitution and laws of the United States.
(6) The Secretary of State  shall preside over the convening of electors under this section
and shall perform any duty as an administrator on behalf of the electors  in accordance with
the requirements placed on electors under federal law and the laws of this state.
SECTION 2.
This 2024 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4019 (HB 4019-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House February 15, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4019 (HB 4019-INTRO) Page 2